North Dakota, session 69, SB2400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 15.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Education service provider" means a person approved to provide qualified education
services. The term does not include a participating school.
2. "Eligible student" means an elementary or secondary student who is a resident of this
state and eligible to attend a public school, including a student who has received a
scholarship under the education savings account program, if the student has not
graduated from high school or reached twenty - one years of age .
3. "Parent" means parent or legal guardian.
4. "Participating school" means a nonpublic school providing education to elementary
students, secondary students, or both, which has notified the administrator of the
school's intention to participate in the education savings account program and comply
with the education savings account program requirements.
5. "Qualified educational expenses" means:
a. Tuition and fees at a nonpublic school;
Page No. 1 25.1334.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Textbooks, fees, or payments for educational therapies, including tutoring or
cognitive skills training;
c. Curriculum fees, software, and materials for a course of study for a specific
subject matter or grade level;
d. Tuition or fees for nonpublic online education programs;
e. Tuition for vocational and life skills education approved by the superintenden t o f
education;
f. Education materials and services for students with disabilities from an accredited
provider, including the cost of paraprofessionals and assistants who are trained in
accordance with state law;
g. Standardized test fees and advanced placement examinations or examinations
related to postsecondary education admission or credentialing;
h. Tuition or fees for dual-credit courses;
i. Meals served to students in school buildings;
j. Mental health assistance;
k. Medical appointments necessary for educational benefit;
l. Educational camps; and
m. Qualified expenses as adopted by the superintendent of public instruction in
administrative rules.
Education savings account fund - Establishment - Continuing appropriation .
There is created in the state treasury an education savings account fund. The fund consists
of moneys appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction for the education savings
account program. Moneys in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis for education
savings accounts.
Superintendent of public instruction - Administrator - Duties.
1. The superintendent of public instruction is the education savings account program
administrator, and shall:
a. Annually inform eligible students and parents of the schools participating in the
education savings account program;
b. Create a standard application form a parent of an eligible student may submit to
establish the student's eligibility for the education savings account program. The
Page No. 2 25.1334.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
superintendent shall ensure the application is readily available to interested
families through various sources, including the department's website;
c. Execute a multimedia marketing program targeting eligible families, particularly
families below the state's median household income, informing the families about
the education savings account program and how to apply;
d. Establish a web and phone-based support system providing parents with
education savings account program application support and ongoing account
maintenance support;
e. Reduce potential waste, fraud, and abuse, and ensure that any technology
platform used for the program meets the state's highest security requirements,
including compliance; and
f. Adopt rules to implement this chapter.
2. The superintendent of public instruction may:
a. Make and enter a contract with a third-party entity to administer and audit the
program, including allocating funds from each eligible studen t 's account for the
payment of qualified educational expenses by the eligible studen t 's parent ;
b. Conduct audits or other reviews necessary to properly administer the program;
and
c. Bar a participating school or education service provider from the education
savings account program, if the superintenden t determines the participating
school or education provider has:
(1) Routinely failed to comply with the accountability standards established
under this chapter; or
(2) Failed to provide the eligible studen t with the educational services funded by
the education savings account.
Enrollment - Account deposits.
1. From January first to June thirtieth immediately preceding the school year for which
the education savings account payment is requested, the parent of an eligible student
may request an education savings account payment by submitting an application to
the superintendent of public instruction.
Page No. 3 25.1334.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. Within thirty days of submission of an application, the superintenden t of public
instruction or third-party entity shall notify the parent whether the eligible studen t is
approved for the following school year and specify the amount of the education
savings account payment for the eligible studen t , if known at the time of the notice .
3. For an eligible studen t approved for an education savings account payment, the
superintenden t of public instruction or third-party entity shall establish an individua l
account for the eligible studen t in the education savings account fund and deposit the
payment into the eligible studen t 's individual account within thirty days following
submission of the application, but in any case no later than July fifteenth. The funds
must be available immediately for the payment of qualified educational expenses
incurred by the parent for the eligible studen t during the fiscal year .
4. A nonpublic school or other provider of qualified educational expenses accepting
payment from a parent using funds from an eligible studen t 's individual account in the
fund may not refund, rebate, or share any portion of the payment with the parent or
eligible studen t .
5. Moneys remaining in an eligible studen t 's individual account upon conclusion of the
fiscal year must be returned to the education savings account fund.
6. Beginning with the school budget year beginning July 1, 2026, for each school year ,
an eligible studen t who :
a. Attends a public school is eligible to receive an education savings account
payment of five hundred dollars .
b. Is enrolled in and attends a nonpublic participating school is eligible to receive an
education savings account payment of:
(1) Three thousand five hundred dollars, if the eligible studen t 's household has
an annual income less than or equal to three hundred percent of the most
recently revised poverty income guidelines published by the United States
department of health and human services.
(2) Two thousand dollars, if the eligible studen t 's household has an annua l
income less than or equal to five hundred percent of the most recently
revised poverty income guidelines published by the United States
department of health and human services.
Page No. 4 25.1334.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(3) Five hundred dollars, if the eligible studen t does not qualify under
paragraph 1 or 2 .
c. Participates in a home education program in accordance with chapter 15.1 - 23, is
eligible to receive an education savings account payment of five hundred dollars .
7. Education savings account payments may be approved for one school year and
applications must be submitted annually for payments in subsequent school years.
8. Funds deposited in an education savings account are not taxable income to the parent
or eligible studen t .
Participating schools - Accountability standards.
1. A participating school shall:
a. Comply with all health and safety laws or codes that apply to nonpublic schools .
b. Hold a valid occupancy permit if required by the city in which the school is
located.
c. Certify the school complies with the nondiscrimination policies under 42 U.S.C .
1981.
d. Conduct criminal background checks on employees.
e. Exclude from employment any individual who:
(1) Is not permitted by state law to work in a nonpublic school; or
(2) Might reasonably pose a threat to the safety of eligible studen t s .
f. Provide a parent with a receipt for all qualifying expenses at the school.
g. Demonstrate the school's financial viability, if the school will receive fifty thousand
dollars or more during the school year, by filing with the superintendent of public
instruction before the start of the school year:
(1) A surety bond payable to the state in an amount equal to the aggregate
amount of funds from education savings accounts the participating school
expects to receive; or
(2) Financial information demonstrating the school is able to pay an aggregate
amount equal to the amount of the funds from education savings accounts
the participating school expects to receive.
Page No. 5 25.1334.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. a. An eligible studen t using education savings account program funds for tuition
payments at a participating school shall take required state tests and
assessments in accordance with section 15.1 - 21 - 08 .
b. The superintenden t of public instruction shall compile and publish assessmen t
results in accordance with sections 15.1 - 21 - 09 and 15.1 - 21 - 10 .
c. The superintenden t of public instruction shall administer an annual parenta l
satisfaction survey requesting each parent of an eligible studen t receiving an
education savings account program payment to indicate the number of years the
child has participated in the education savings account program and express the
parent's:
(1) Satisfaction with the education savings account program; and
(2) Opinions on other topics, items, or issues that may indicate the
effectiveness of the education savings account program.
3. A participating school or education service provider is autonomous and not an agent of
the state or federal government. The superintenden t may not regulate the educationa l
program of a participating school or education service provider that accepts funds from
an education savings account. The creation of the education savings account program
does not expand the regulatory authority of the state, its officers, or a school district
beyond the regulations necessary to enforce the requirements of the education
savings account program.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -
EDUCATION SAVINGS ACCOUNT PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any moneys in
the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $3,000,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the superintendent of public instruction for the
purpose of administering the education savings account program, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 6 25.1334.04000